hr-HR: Značajke računalnog poslužitelja: Pokreće umjetna inteligencija; Podrška za ECC memoriju; Bilježenje pogrešaka; Ležišta koja se mogu mijenjati bez isključivanja napajanja; Podrška za više procesora; Podrška za RAID; Redundantno napajanje; Daljinsko upravljanje; Podrška za virtualizaciju; Ostalo
tr: Bilgisayar sunucusu özellikleri: Yapay zeka destekli; ECC bellek desteği; Hata kaydı; Çalışırken değiştirilebilir sürücü yuvaları; Çoklu işlemci desteği; RAID desteği; Yedek güç kaynağı; Uzaktan yönetme; Sanallaştırma desteği; Diğer
el: Χαρακτηριστικά διακομιστή υπολογιστή: Με τεχνολογία ΑΙ; Υποστήριξη μνήμης ECC; Καταγραφή σφαλμάτων; Θήκες μονάδας δίσκου με δυνατότητα εναλλαγής; Υποστήριξη πολλαπλών επεξεργαστών; Υποστήριξη RAID; Πλεονάζον τροφοδοτικό; Απομακρυσμένη διαχείριση; Υποστήριξη εικονικοποίησης; Άλλο
sk-SK: Funkcie počítačového servera: Podporovaný umelou inteligenciou; Podpora ECC pamäte; Chyba pri protokolovaní; Pozície pre jednotky vymeniteľné za chodu; Podpora viacerých procesorov; Podpora RAID; Redundantné napájanie; Vzdialená správa; Podpora virtualizácie; Iné
es: Características del servidor informático: Con tecnología de IA; Compatibilidad de memoria ECC; Registro de errores; Bahías para unidades intercambiables en caliente; Compatibilidad con múltiples procesadores; Compatibilidad con RAID; Fuente de alimentación redundante; Gestión remota; Compatibilidad con virtualización; Otros
sl-SI: Funkcije računalniškega strežnika: Poganja UI; Podpora za pomnilnik ECC; Beleženje napak; Hitra menjava reže; Podpora za več procesorjev; RAID podpora; Odvečno napajanje; Upravljanje na daljavo; Podpora za virtualizacijo; Drugo
lt-LT: Kompiuterinio serverio funkcijos: Veikia DI pagrindu; ECC atminties palaikymas; Klaidų registravimas; Karšto keitimo diskų skyriai; Kelių procesorių palaikymas; RAID palaikymas; Dubliuotas maitinimo šaltinis; Nuotolinis valdymas; Virtualizacijos palaikymas; Kita
da: Computerserverfunktioner: AI-drevet; ECC-hukommelsesunderstøttelse; Fejllogning; Hot-swappable-drevbåse; Multiprocessor-support; RAID-understøttelse; Redundant strømforsyning; Fjernstyring; Virtualiseringssupport; Andet
vi: Tính năng máy chủ máy tính: Hỗ trợ bởi AI; Hỗ trợ bộ nhớ ECC; Lỗi đăng nhập; Khoang ổ đĩa có thể thay nhanh; Hỗ trợ đa bộ xử lý; Hỗ trợ RAID; Cấp nguồn dự phòng; Quản lý từ xa; Hỗ trợ ảo hóa; Khác
zh-TW: 電腦伺服器功能: AI 驅動; ECC 記憶體支援; 錯誤記錄; 熱插拔磁碟槽; 多處理器支援; RAID 支援; 備用電源; 遠端管理; 虛擬化支援; 其他
fr: Fonctionnalités du serveur informatique: Doté d’une IA; Prise en charge de la mémoire ECC; Journalisation des erreurs; Baies de disques remplaçables à chaud; Prise en charge multiprocesseur; Prise en charge RAID; Alimentation redondante; Gestion à distance; Prise en charge de la virtualisation; Autre
en: Computer server features: AI-powered; ECC memory support; Error logging; Hot swappable drive bays; Multi-processor support; RAID support; Redundant power supply; Remote management; Virtualization support; Other
ru: Возможности сервера: На базе ИИ; Поддержка памяти ECC; Регистрация ошибок; Отсеки для дисков с возможностью горячей замены; Поддержка нескольких процессоров; Поддержка RAID; Резервный источник питания; Удаленное управление; Поддержка виртуализации; Другое
de: Computerserverfunktionen: KI-gestützt; ECC-Speicherunterstützung; Fehlerprotokollierung; Im Betrieb austauschbare Laufwerksschächte; Multiprozessor-Unterstützung; RAID-Unterstützung; Redundante Stromversorgung; Fernverwaltung; Virtualisierungsunterstützung; Sonstiges
pt-PT: Características do servidor de computador: Alimentado por IA; Suporte de memória ECC; Registo de erros; Compartimentos de unidade de troca a quente; Suporte multiprocessador; Suporte RAID; Fonte de energia redundante; Gestão remota; Suporte de virtualização; Outro
bg-BG: Характеристики на компютърен сървър: Задвижван от AI; Поддръжка на ECC памет; Регистриране на грешки; Отделения за дискове с възможност за смяна по време на работа; Поддръжка на многопроцесорни устройства; Поддръжка на RAID; Резервно захранване; Дистанционно управление; Поддръжка на виртуализация; Други
it: Funzionalità del server informatico: Alimentato dall'intelligenza artificiale; Supporto memoria ECC; Errore durante la registrazione; Ripiani per unità sostituibili a caldo; Supporto multiprocessore; Supporto RAID; Alimentazione power supply; Gestione da remoto; Supporto per la virtualizzazione; Altro
pl: Funkcje serwera komputerowego: Obsługiwany przez sztuczną inteligencję; Obsługa pamięci ECC; Rejestrowanie błędów; Kieszenie na dyski wymieniane podczas pracy; Obsługa wielu procesorów; Obsługa RAID; Redundantne zasilanie; Zdalne zarządzanie; Obsługa wirtualizacji; Inne
cs: Vlastnosti počítačového serveru: S umělou inteligencí; Podpora pamětí ECC; Protokolování chyb; Zásuvky pro disky vyměnitelné za provozu; Podpora více procesorů; Podpora RAID; Redundantní napájení; Vzdálená správa; Podpora virtualizace; Jiné
hu: Számítógépes szerver jellemzői: AI-alapú; ECC memória támogatása; Hibanaplózás; Működés közben cserélhető merevlemez-beépítőhelyek; Több processzor támogatása; RAID-támogatás; Redundáns tápellátás; Távfelügyelet; Virtualizáció támogatása; Egyéb
nl: Kenmerken computerserver: AI-aangedreven; ECC-geheugenondersteuning; Foutregistratie; Hot swappable schijfsleuven; Ondersteuning voor meerdere processors; RAID-ondersteuning; Noodvoeding; Beheer op afstand; Ondersteuning voor virtualisatie; Andere
ko: 컴퓨터 서버 기능: AI 기반; ECC 메모리 지원; 오류 로깅; 핫스왑 가능한 드라이브 베이; 다중 프로세서 지원; RAID 지원; 중복 전원 공급 장치; 원격 관리; 가상화 지원; 기타
sv: Detaljer för datorserver: AI-driven; ECC-minnesstöd; Fel vid loggning; Hot swap-enhetsfack; Stöd för flera processorer; RAID-stöd; Redundant strömförsörjning; Fjärrhantering; Virtualiseringsstöd; Övrigt
zh-CN: 计算机服务器功能: AI 赋能; ECC 内存支持; 错误日志记录; 热插拔驱动器托架; 多处理器支持; RAID 支持; 冗余电源; 远程管理; 虚拟化支持; 其他
nb: Dataserverfunksjoner: KI-drevet; ECC-minnestøtte; Feil ved logging; Hot swappable diskbrønner; Støtte for flere prosessorer; RAID-støtte; Redundant strømforsyning; Fjernstyring; Virtualiseringsstøtte; Annet
ja: コンピュータサーバの機能: AI搭載; ECCメモリーサポート; エラーログ; ホットスワップ対応ドライブベイ; マルチプロセッササポート; RAIDサポート; 冗長電源; リモート管理; 仮想化サポート; その他
fi: Tietokonepalvelimen ominaisuudet: Tekoälyllä toimiva; ECC-muistin tuki; Virhe kirjautumisessa; Käytön aikana vaihdettavat asemapaikat; Usean prosessorin tuki; RAID-tuki; Redundantti virtalähde; Etähallinta; Virtualisoinnin tuki; Muu
pt-BR: Recursos do servidor de computador: Com IA; Suporte de memória ECC; Registro de erros; Compartimentos de unidades com troca quente; Suporte a vários processadores; Suporte RAID; Fonte de energia redundante; Gerenciamento remoto; Suporte a virtualização; Outro
th: คุณลักษณะเซิร์ฟเวอร์คอมพิวเตอร์: ขับเคลื่อนด้วย AI; รองรับหน่วยความจำ ECC; การบันทึกข้อผิดพลาด; ช่องใส่ไดรฟ์แบบถอดเปลี่ยนได้; รองรับโปรเซสเซอร์หลายตัว; รองรับ RAID; แหล่งจ่ายไฟสำรอง; การจัดการระยะไกล; รองรับเทคโนโลยีการจําลองเสมือน; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Caracteristici computer pentru server: Pe bază de AI; Suport memorie ECC; Înregistrarea erorilor; Compartimente pentru unități interschimbabile la cald; Suport multi-procesor; Suport RAID; Alimentare redundantă; Gestionare de la distanță; Suport pentru virtualizare; Altele